Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.230

Total service credit.

Subject to the provisions of RCW 43.43.260, at retirement, the total service credited to a member shall consist of all the member's current service and accredited prior service.

[ 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 25; 1965 c 8 s 43.43.230. Prior: 1953 c 262 s 3; 1947 c 250 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 6362-92.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 52: See note following RCW 2.10.180.